Utah statutes.
13-14a-6.   Security interest of wholesaler or manufacturer not affected.

This chapter may not be construed to affect in any way any security interest that the wholesaler or manufacturer may have in the inventory of the dealer. The retailer, manufacturer, or wholesaler may furnish a representative to inspect all parts and certify their acceptability when packed for shipment.

